Utah statutes.
10-2-113.   Notification to lieutenant governor of incorporation election
results.
Within ten days of the canvass of the incorporation election, the county clerk
shall send written notice to the lieutenant governor of:
(1)  the results of the election; and
(2)  if the incorporation measure passes:
(a)  the name of the city; and
(b)  the class of the city as provided under Section 10-2-301.
